Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
463E

PODIATRISTS

Section

463E-1 Definitions

463E-2 License required

463E-3 Qualification for licensure

463E-4 Examinations

463E-5 Fees; expenses

463E-6 Revocation, suspension, or denial of
license;

sanctions

463E-6.5 Reporting requirements

463E-7 Repealed

463E-8 Witnesses in such proceeding

463E-9 Recalcitrant witnesses; contempt

463E-10 Perjury

463E-11 Penalty

463E-12 Rules

463E-12.5 Delegation of duties

463E-13 Repealed

463E-14 Discrimination prohibited

463E-15 Use of podiatrist; public programs

463E-16 Qualifications; ankle fracture surgery

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Health care peer review, see chapter 671D.

Health care professionals, see chapter 451D.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next